dictionaries/gd/index.aff
REP sprèadh spreadhadh
REP srathspè srath_spè
REP strìth strì
REP t-Samhuinn t-Samhain
REP t-Stròim t-Sròim
REP t-foghar t-fhoghar
REP t-oghar t-fhoghar
REP t-Hogh Togh
REP t-srì strì
REP t-strì strì
REP taobh-a-muigh taobh_a-muigh
REP th'n$ th_'n
REP th-ann th'_ann
REP tha'm tha_'m
REP tha'n tha_'n
REP thall-thairis thall_thairis
REP thiomchioll thimcheall
REP thriur thriùir
REP tiomchioll timcheall
REP tlia tha
REP triur triùir
REP trì-deug trì_deug
REP tànaig tàinig
REP uair-is-uair uair_is_uair
REP uile-gu-lèir uile_gu_lèir
REP Òg-mhìos Ògmhios
REP àireamh-fòn àireamh_fòn
REP àmanan amannan
REP òitreachais òtrachais
REP òitreachas òtrachas


MAP 5
MAP aáàAÁÀ
MAP eéèEÉÈ
MAP iíìIÍÌ
MAP oóòOÓÒ
MAP uúùUÚÙ

PFX S Y 18
PFX S   b     bh          b[^h]
PFX S   B     Bh          B[^h]
PFX S   c     ch          c[^h]
PFX S   C     Ch          C[^h]
PFX S   d     dh          d[^h]
PFX S   D     Dh          D[^h]
PFX S   f     fh          f[^h]
PFX S   F     Fh          F[^h]
PFX S   g     gh          g[^h]
PFX S   G     Gh          G[^h]
PFX S   m     mh          m[^h]
PFX S   M     Mh          M[^h]
PFX S   p     ph          p[^h]
PFX S   P     Ph          P[^h]
PFX S   s     sh          s[aeiouáéíóúàèìòùlnr]
PFX S   S     Sh          S[aeiouáéíóúàèìòùlnr]
PFX S   t     th          t[^h]
PFX S   T     Th          T[^h]

PFX H Y 1
PFX H   0     h-          [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]

PFX G N 1
PFX G   0     h-          [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]

PFX D Y 4
PFX D   0     d'          [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]
PFX D   0     d'          [Ff]h
PFX D   f     d'fh        f[^h]
PFX D   F     d'Fh        F[^h]

PFX E Y 4
PFX E   0     dh'          [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]
PFX E   0     dh'          [Ff]h
PFX E   f     dh'fh        f[^h]
PFX E   F     dh'Fh        F[^h]

PFX T Y 2
PFX T   0     t-        [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]
PFX T   0     t-        [Ss][aeiouáéíóúàèìòùlnr]

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0     n-        [aeiouáéíóúàèìòùAEIOUÁÉÍÓÚÀÈÌÒÙ]

SFX K Y 5
SFX K   0     -sa          [^-]
SFX K   0     -se          [^-]
SFX K   0     -ne          [^-]
SFX K   0     -san         [^-]
SFX K   0     -eigin       [^-]


# These are obsolete rules which passed hyphen-less addition of
# the emphatic suffixes i.e. these would pass taighsa as OK as required
# by an old version of GOC and affix eigin directly e.g. taigheigin
#SFX K   0     sa          [^-]
#SFX K   0     se          [^-]
#SFX K   0     ne          [^-]
#SFX K   0     san         [^-]
#SFX K   0     eigin       [^e]
#SFX K   0     igin         e
