dictionaries/gd/index.dic
Aimeireaganach/DEGHKNT
Airmeineach/DEGHKNT
Angla-Nòrmannach/GK
Angla-Shasannachaibh/DEHKNT
Anndra/E
Arabach/DEGHKNT
Arùbachaibh/DEHKNT
Astràiliach/GK
Coptach/K
Eabhrach/GK
Eadraidhean/DEHKNT
Easragain/E
Eastoineach/DEGHKNT
Fhleamaise/DEK
Fhàclannachaibh/DEK
Foillseachaidh/DEK
Iain/DEHKNT
Iapanach/DEGHKNT
Innd-Innsis/DEHKN
Innseanach/DEGHKNT
Ionaid/DEHKNT
Iospàinnteach/DEGHKNT
Iospàinnteachaibh/DEHKNT
Iùdhachaibh/DEHKNT
Iùgoslabhach/DEGHKNT
Leasotaiche/K
Ogsatanaise/DEHKN
Santali/KT
Seàd/T
Shligeachaibh/K
Slat-bheinn/T
Suainis/KT
Sèirbich/KT
Ugandach/DEGHKNT
Ultach/DEHKNT
Uruguaidheach/DEGHKNT
Uruguaidheacha/DEHKNT
Usbagach/DEGHKNT
abacasaibh/DEHKNT
abarach/GK
abharsaig/DEHKN
acainn-mheasaidh/DEHKN
acantas/DEHKNT
achd/DEHKNT
achdail/GK
achdan/DEHKNT
adagaibh/DEHKN
adhairceach/GK
adhar-dheilbh/DEHKNT
adhartairean/DEHKNT
adhartairibh/DEHKNT
adhbrainn/DEHKNT
adhrachail/GK
aerialan/DEHKNT
agallamhairean/DEHKNT
agragaideachaidh/DEHKNT
aibheiseach/GK
aibhneig/DEHKN
aichill/DEHKN
aide/DEHKN
aigneach/GK
ailbheanaibh/DEHKNT
ailleann/DEHKN
ailm-stocaibh/DEHKNT
ailt/DEHKNT
ailteireachdan/DEHKN
aimhreiteach/GK
ainbfheoil/DEHKN
aineolach/GK
aingil/DEHKNT
ainisean-rionnagach/DEHKN
ainm-chleachdaiche/DEHKNT
ainm-mhallachaidh/DEHKNT
ainmeil/GK
ainneamhach/GK
ainneamhag/DEHKN
air-làmhach/GK
airceas/DEHKNT
aireach-chloinne/DEHKNT
airgid-bhuidheachais/DEHKNT
ais-aodach/DEHKNT
aiseil/DEHKNT
aisigeach/GK
aisling/DEHKN
ait-bhàin/DEHKNT
aiteil/DEHKNT
aithghearr/GK
aithisg-rannsachaidh/DEHKN
aitreibh/DEHKNT
aladh/DEGHKNT
alcoil/DEHKNT
algairimeach/GK
allail/GK
allantas/DEHKNT
almsaidhean/DEHKNT
alpadh/DEHKNT
alùmanumach/GK
amadan/DEHKNT
amalaichte/GK
amallaibh/DEHKNT
amasan/DEHKNT
amhaichean-acrach/DEHKN
amharcain-chamara/DEHKNT
amhasgaibh/DEHKNT
an-abaich/GK
an-bhàsaibh/DEHKNT
an-daoinibh/DEHKNT
an-uasal/GK
ana-cothroim/DEHKNT
anacair/DEHKN
anacrach/GK
anairt-bhùird/DEHKNT
annaide/DEHKN
aodach/DEHKNT
aodach-oidhche/DEHKNT
aodhnairibh/DEHKNT
aoighean/DEHKNT
aoigheil/GK
aon-adharcaich/DEHKNT
aon-toileach/GK
aona-rothairibh/DEHKNT
aonadh-chèirde/DEHKNT
aonar/DEHKNT
aonarain/DEHKNT
aosta/GK
ara-bacain/DEHKNT
aran-tunnaig/DEHKNT
argamaide/DEHKN
arm-theagaisg/DEHKNT
asal-obrach/DEHKNT
asann/DEHKN
astarach/GK
at-bhuinn/DEHKNT
atal/DEHKNT
ath-aodaichean/DEHKNT
ath-dhùthchais/DEHKNT
ath-ghnàthachadh/DEHKNT
ath-mhalairteach/GK
ath-nàdarachadh/DEHKNT
ath-shlànachaidhean/DEHKNT
ath-stiùirte/GK
ath-stoireag/DEHKN
athailtibh/DEHKN
atharraisiche/K
atlais/DEHKNT
baogaidean/K
bhad/K
bhaothaireachd/K
bhilleanaibh/K
bholg-snàimh/K
bhroinnibh/K
bhuineag/K
bhòrd-seinnse/K
bocagaibh/K
brice-sìth/K
buidheann-chosnaidh/K
bèigeileidean/K
caisead/K
cead-pàircidh/K
chadhanan/K
chaothachaile/K
cheathraich/K
chlach-fhaireachaidh/K
chlàradh-taghaidh/K
cho-roinntich/K
chomhardaidh-meadhain/K
chraobhan-liomaideige/K
chrèadh-chloiche/K
chuit/K
chìsean-rathaid/K
cinneachaile/K
clobhsaibh/K
cnòthan-odhaire/K
coisrigte/K
cothromaichean/K
cruaidh-theudan/K
cuilean-coin/K
cèille/K
daite/K
deodhaibh/K
dheidhbhlean/K
dhranndanan/K
dhèideag/K
dlùitheid/K
dubh-leagailibh/K
dùbhlachdan/K
eacarsaich/DEHKN
each-lainn/DEHKN
eachraisibh/DEHKN
eaconameatraig/GK
eadar-cheanglaibh/DEHKNT
eadar-dhealaichte/GK
eadar-mheadhanaibh/DEHKNT
eadar-obrachail/GK
eadar-sgoith/DEHKN
eadar-theangadairibh/DEHKNT
eadra-churraicealach/GK
eagrachadh/DEHKNT
ealaidhean/DEHKN
ealairibh/DEHKN
ealanta/GK
eallachaige/DEHKN
earbaill-fhuilt/DEHKNT
earbardaibh/DEHKNT
earchallach/GK
earraide/DEHKN
earrann/DEHKN
eas-aontachaidh/DEHKNT
eas-òrdach/GK
easain-charrain/DEHKNT
easbhaidhean/DEHKN
easgainne-gile/DEHKN
easgann-fairge/DEHKN
eathair-iomain/DEHKNT
eatharaibh/DEHKNT
eidheann-thalmhainn/DEHKN
eighibh/DEHKN
eileanan-tràghaidh/DEHKNT
eileinibh/DEHKNT
eirc/DEHKN
eireachdail/GK
eisgeachdan/DEHKN
eitich/DEHKNT
eu-domhain/GK
euchdaibh/DEHKNT
eucoiribh/DEHKN
eun-choille/DEHKNT
eunain/DEHKNT
eòin/DEHKNT
eòinibh/DEHKNT
eòlaiche-bhìdh/DEHKNT
eòlanach/GK
fadhairte/DEK
faide/DEK
fainchibh/DEK
faireachalaich/DEK
falcairean-mìne/DEK
famhaibh/DEK
faoilinn/DEK
faoisgneachaidh/DEK
farbhas/DEK
farraidibh/DEK
feadaraileachd/DEK
feallsanachdaibh/DEK
fear-cruthachaidh/DEK
fear-leasachaidh/DEK
feasan/DEK
feireadaibh/DEK
feuran-breaca/DEK
feusagan-gobhair/DEK
feòraig/DEK
fhacal-luirg/DEK
fhaidhbhilean/DEK
fhail-chon/DEK
fhaircillean-òil/DEK
fhaireachalas/DEK
fhaisgineadairibh/DEK
fhamh-thòrr/DEK
fhannachdan/DEK
fhaoiseidibh/DEK
fhar-phill/DEK
fharraidean/DEK
fhathain/DEK
fheallaidhean/DEK
fheamainn-chìrein/DEK
fhear-gnìomhachais/DEK
fhearsaide/DEK
fheastrachaibh/DEK
fheursaigean/DEK
fheòirneagaibh/DEK
fheòrasaibh/DEK
fhilleagan/DEK
fhiodh-choille/DEK
fhir-mhara/DEK
fhir-thòrachd/DEK
fho-cheumnaidh/DEK
fho-chùmhnantairean/DEK
fho-fhastaidhean/DEK
fhoirmealachaibh/DEK
fhonndais/DEK
fhreiceadairibh/DEK
fhriobhag/DEK
fhuaintean/DEK
fhuaraidhean-cluaise/DEK
fhàisgeadairean/DEK
fhàragaibh/DEK
fhèith-mhothachaidh/DEK
fhìneadh/DEK
fiadhaibh/DEK
fianaisean-sùl/DEK
fionnsgeulaibh/DEK
fiosan-freagairt/DEK
fiosanan/DEK
fleodradh/DEK
fliopair/DEK
foghantais/DEK
foidheime/DEK
frachdaibh/DEK
fraoch-meangain/DEK
frosgaibh/DEK
frìth-mhèirleach/DEK
furmailtean/DEK
fàidhireachdan/DEK
fèillean-reic/DEK
fèin-mheasaidhean/DEK
fùdar-maise/DEK
fùirneis/DEK
gheal-bhodachaibh/K
ghoineir-mhara/K
glais-ceap/K
guth-taghaidh/K
ialaibh/DEHKN
ialaichean/DEHKN
iarnaichean/DEHKN
iarsmadh/DEHKNT
iasadach/GK
imdeal/DEHKNT
imfhiosach/GK
imrichibh/DEHKNT
in-ghabhail/DEHKN
inneal-tiormachaidh/DEHKNT
inneanan/DEHKNT
innleachdach/GK
innteirt/DEHKN
iodhlannaibh/DEHKN
iodhlannan/DEHKN
iol-chalpa/GK
iolra/DEHKNT
ioma-chuimseach/GK
ioma-lideach/GK
iomalach/DEHKN
iomall-bhailteach/GK
ion-cheadaichte/GK
ion-dhìonan/DEHKNT
ion-phortaidh/DEHKNT
ion-ròghnach/GK
ionad-bhòtaidh/DEHKNT
ionad-bhùithtean/DEHKNT
ionaid-taic/DEHKNT
ionaltraidh/DEHKNT
ionmholta/GK
ioso-top/DEHKNT
iris-leabhar/DEHKNT
iris-leabharaibh/DEHKNT
iùlmhor/GK
laghd-mheatailtean/K
lorgan-chaorach/K
mapaid/K
mheannta-chùbhraidh/K
mhèirlichean/K
mulcairean/K
obair-càraidh/DEHKN
obraiche-imrich/DEHKNT
obraiche-stiùiridh/DEHKNT
obraichean-imrich/DEHKNT
ochdan/DEHKNT
ochdnair/DEHKNT
oifigearan-probhaidh/DEHKNT
oifigearan-shochairean/DEHKNT
oifigeil/GK
oir-loidhnichear/DEHKNT
ois/DEHKNT
ois-fheòil/DEHKN
olc/DEGHKNT
orangutan/DEHKNT
organ-eaglais/DEHKNT
os-nàdarra/GK
os-theacsaibh/DEHKNT
ospadal-chuarantain/DEHKNT
ospadal-cloinne/DEHKNT
phigheannaibh/K
piollaige/K
ranntair/K
rùitilich/K
sachasan/KT
sail-shùiste/KT
samhraichean/KT
saor-thoileachaibh/KT
seachdadan/KT
seallaidhean-cùil/KT
seannsairibh/KT
seasamhaibh/KT
seileadair/KT
seisearan/KT
seòlaistibh/KT
seòmaran-ithe/KT
sgeamannan-thaighean/K
sheaghaiche/K
shnodhach-craoibhe/K
siataig/KT
sinnsearaibh/KT
siomptom/KT
siorap/KT
siùcaran/KT
slat-fhuigheige/KT
sliochd-taighe/KT
sluigidh/KT
snas/KT
snàthadan-càraidh/KT
soighnealasaibh/KT
somaltan/KT
spuir-chùil/K
sreanganaibh/KT
sruthan-lìonaidh/KT
suaithneas/KT
surragan/KT
sàthaidhnean/KT
sèamar/KT
sìoborgaibh/KT
sòdomas/KT
sùgha/KT
teudaig/K
tholl-puirt/K
thùirneapaibh/K
tuinnteasaibh/K
uachdranasaibh/DEHKNT
uaigealta/GK
uallachanaibh/DEHKNT
uchd-mhacachadh/DEHKNT
uchdail/GK
ugh-coilich/DEHKNT
ugh-sìthein/DEHKNT
uidheam/DEHKNT
uile-choitcheann/GK
uinneanan/DEHKNT
uisge-leigheasach/GK
uisge-uachdair/DEHKNT
uisgeacha/DEHKNT
ullachaidh-sgeòil/DEHKNT
ullachaidhean/DEHKNT
ultra-tana/GK
Àrd-uachdarain/DEHKNT
Èipheiteach/DEGHKNT
Ìlich/DEHKNT
àbhaiste/DEHKN
àilgheasach/GK
àireamhachd/DEHKN
àireamhachdaibh/DEHKN
àitean-falaich/DEHKNT
àloë/DEHKNT
àmhgharach/GK
àran/DEHKN
àrd-mhanaidseir/DEHKNT
àrd-mhiann/DEHKNT
àrd-riaghladairean/DEHKNT
àrd-thìribh/DEHKN
àrd-tìreach/GK
às-phortaidh/DEHKNT
às-tharraingeach/GK
èadhradairibh/DEHKNT
èig/DEHKNT
èigeantach/GK
èill-bhròige/DEHKN
èill-shùist/DEHKN
ìomhaighe-cuirp/DEHKN
ìosal/GK
òbanaibh/DEHKNT
òirlichean/DEHKN
òisg/DEHKN
òlachas/DEHKNT
òlmhor/GK
òrdha/GK
òrdughaibh/DEHKNT
òstair/DEHKNT
òthasgain/DEHKNT
ùghdarrasail/GK
ùineadairean/DEHKNT
ùineadairibh/DEHKNT
ùirghreannach/GK
ùr-nòsach/GK
ùrlar-bualaidh/DEHKNT
ùspairt/DEHKN
